src/fst/test/gt-desc-yamls/proper-contracted_gt-desc.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each proper:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Contracted syllable propers belonging to DAVVISUOLU-plc, GEAVNNIS-plc, SULLOT-plc, LASSAT-plc

Tests:
  Proper - Kerguelensuolu: # DAVVISUOLU-plc
    Kerguelensuolu+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: Kerguelensullo
    Kerguelensuolu+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: Kerguelensullui
    
  Proper - Stuorrageavŋŋis: # GEAVNNIS-plc
    Stuorrageavŋŋis+N+Prop+Sg+Gen: Stuorrageavgŋá
    Stuorrageavŋŋis+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: Stuorrageavgŋái

  Proper - Doggeráhppát: # SULLOT-plc
    Doggeráhppát+N+Prop+Pl+Gen: Doggeráhppáid
    Doggeráhppát+N+Prop+Pl+Ill: Doggeráhppáide
    Doggeráhppát+N+Prop+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: [doggeráhppálažžii, doggeráhppálažžai]

  Proper - Njárgalássát: # LASSAT-plc
    Njárgalássát+N+Prop+Pl+Gen: Njárgalássáid
    Njárgalássát+N+Prop+Pl+Ill: Njárgalássáide
    Njárgalássát+N+Prop+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ill: [njárgalássálažžii, njárgalássálažžai]
